public/strategies/hyphy.txt
                   BBBGY2 welch BGBGG3 beech GGBGG4 bench GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BGGGG3 belch GGGGG4
                                BGYGG3 leech GGGGG4
                                BYBGY3 check GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   BBBYB2 chill GGBBB3 chunk GGGGG4
                                GGGGB3 child GGGGB4 chili GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                                GYBBB3 cough GGGGG4
                   BBBYG2 chose GGBBG3 chide GGGBG4 chime GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                GGGBG3 choke GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   BBBYY2 cheek GGBGB3 chief GGGGG4
                                GGGBB3 chess GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   BBGBB2 shawl BGGBB3 khaki GGGGG4
                                GGGBB3 shank GGGGG4
                                GGGBG3 shall GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                                GYGBB3 smash GGGGG4
                                GYGBY3 slash GGGGG4
                                GYGYB3 swash GGGGG4
                                YYGBB3 gnash BBGGG4 quash GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                YYGBY3 flash GGGGG4
                                YYGYB3 awash GGGGG4
                   BBGBG2 dwalm BBGBB3 shake GGGBG4 shave GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBGBY3 shame GGGGG4
                                BBGGB3 shale GGGGG4
                                BYGGB3 whale GGGGG4
                                YBGBB3 shade GGGGG4
                   BBGBY2 leash GGGGG3
                   BBGGB2 shack BGGGG3 whack GGGGG4
                                BYGGB3 coach GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   BBGGY2 beach BGGGG3 leach GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   BBGYB2 clash GBGBY3 chaff GGGBB4 chain GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                GBGGY3 chasm GGGGG4
                                GBGYY3 chaos GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                                GYGBY3 chalk GGGGG4
                   BBGYG2 chafe GGGBG3 chase GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   BBYBB2 laugh GGGGG3
                                YYBBY3 shoal GGGGG4
                   BBYBY2 ahead GGGGG3
                                GYYBB3 ashen GGGGG4
                   BBYYB2 china GGGGG3
                   BGBBB2 brush GGGGG3
                   BGBBY2 fresh GGGGG3
                   BGBYB2 crush GGGGG3
                   BGGBB2 brash GGGGG3
                   BGGYB2 crash GGGGG3
                   BYBBB2 whirl BGBGB3 shorn GGGGG4
                                BGBYB3 shrub GGGGB4 shrug GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BGGGB3 shirk GGGGG4
                                BGGYB3 rhino GGGGG4
                                BYBYB3 rough GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   BYBBG2 shire BGBGG3 where GGGGG4
                                GGBGG3 shore GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   BYBBY2 sheer GGBGY3 shrew GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                                YYBGG3 usher GGGGG4
                   BYBGB2 birch BBGGG3 lurch GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   BYBYB2 choir GGBBY3 churn GGGGG4
                                GGGBY3 chord GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   BYBYG2 chore GGGGG3
                   BYBYY2 cheer GGGGG3
                   BYGBB2 shard BGGGB3 wharf GGGGG4
                                GGGGB3 shark GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   BYGBG2 share GGGGG3
                   BYGGB2 roach GGGGG3
                   BYGGY2 reach GGGGG3
                   BYGYB2 chard GGGGB3 charm GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                                GGGYB3 chair GGGGG4
                   BYYBB2 marsh BGYBG3 rajah GGGGG4
                                BYYBY3 abhor GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   BYYBY2 rehab GGGGG3
                                YYYGB3 shear GGGGG4
                   BYYGB2 march BGYGG3 ranch GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   GBBBB2 thing GGBBB3 thumb GGGGG4
                                GGBGG3 thong GGGGG4
                                GGGGB3 think GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                                GYBBB3 tooth GGGGG4
                                GYBBY3 tough GGGGG4
                   GBBBG2 theme GGBBG3 those GGGGG4
                                GGGBG3 these GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   GBBBY2 teeth GBGYY3 theft GGGGG4
                                GGBGG3 tenth GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                                GYBBY3 thief GGGGG4
                   GBBGB2 thick GGGGG3
                                GYBGB3 touch GGGGG4
                   GBGBB2 thank GGGGG3
                   GBGGY2 teach GGGGG3
                   GBYBY2 theta GGGGG3
                   GGBBB2 truth GGGGG3
                   GGGBB2 trash GGGGG3
                   GYBBB2 throb GGGBB3 thrum GGGGG4
                                GGGGB3 throw GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                                GGYBB3 third GGGGG4
                                GGYYB3 thorn GGGGG4
                   GYBBG2 there GGGGG3
                                GGYYG3 three GGGGG4
                   GYBBY2 their GGGGG3
                                GGYBY3 threw GGGGG4
                   GYBGB2 torch GGGGG3
                   YBBBB2 noust BBBBY3 fifth BGBGG4 width GGGGG5
                                             GGBGG4 filth GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBBYG3 shift GGGGG4
                                BBBYY3 sixth GGGGG4
                                             GYBGG4 smith GGGGG5
                                BGBBY3 booth GGGGG4
                                BGBYY3 sooth GGGGG4
                                BGGBY3 mouth GGGGG4
                                BGGYY3 south GGGGG4
                                BYBGG3 ghost GGGGG4
                                BYBYG3 shoot GGGGG4
                                BYBYY3 sloth GGGGG4
                                BYYBY3 quoth GGGGG4
                                BYYYG3 shout GGGGG4
                                GBBBY3 ninth GGGGG4
                                YBGYG3 shunt GGGGG4
                                YGBBY3 month GGGGG4
                   YBBBG2 white GGGGG3
                   YBBBY2 ethos GGGGG3
                                YYYBY3 sheet GGGGG4
                   YBBGB2 bound BBBBB3 witch GGGGG4
                                BBBBY3 ditch GGGGG4
                                BBYBY3 dutch GGGGG4
                                BGBYB3 notch GGGGG4
                                GBYBB3 butch GGGGG4
                                GGBBB3 botch GGGGG4
                   YBBGY2 fetch GGGGG3
                   YBBYB2 cloth GGGGG3
                   YBBYG2 chute GGGGG3
                   YBBYY2 chest GGGGG3
                                YYYBY3 ethic GGGGG4
                   YBGBB2 loath BBGGG3 swath GGGGG4
                                BBGYG3 stash GGGGG4
                                BBGYY3 shaft GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                                YBGYY3 shalt GGGGG4
                   YBGBY2 death GGGGG3
                   YBGYB2 chant GGGGG3
                   YBYBB2 faith GGGGG3
                   YBYBY2 wheat GGGGG3
                   YBYGB2 climb GBBBB3 catch GGGGG4
                                YBBBB3 watch GGGGG4
                                YBBBY3 batch GGGGG4
                                YBBYB3 match GGGGG4
                                YYBBB3 latch GGGGG4
                   YBYYY2 cheat GGGGG3
                   YGBBB2 broth BGGGG3 froth GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   YGGBB2 wrath GGGGG3
                   YYBBB2 swing BBBBB3 forth GGGGG4
                                BBBYB3 north GGGGG4
                                BBYBB3 birth BGGGG4 mirth GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBYBY3 girth GGGGG4
                                BYBBB3 worth GGGGG4
                                GBBBB3 short GGGGG4
                                GBGBB3 shirt GGGGG4
                   YYBBY2 ether BGGGG3 other GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                                YYYBY3 berth GGGGG4
                   YYBGY2 retch GGGGG3
                   YYGYB2 chart GGGGG3
                   YYYBY2 earth GGGGG3
      YBBBG1 whiny BGBBG2 shady GGGBG3 shaky GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   BGGGG2 shiny GGGGG3
                   GGGGG2
                   YGBBG2 showy GGGGG3
      YBBYB1 thigh BGBBG2 shush GGGGG3
                   BGGBG2 which GGGGG3
                   GGGGG2
      YBGBB1 depth GGGGG2
      YBYBB1 crate BBBBB2 plush GGGGG3
                                YBBBY3 whoop GGGGG4
                   BBBBG2 phone GGGGG3
                   BBBBY2 sheep BGGBG3 whelp GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   BBBGB2 photo GGGGG3
                   BBBYB2 thump GGGGG3
                   BBGBG2 phase GGGGG3
                                YGGYG3 shape GGGGG4
                   BBYBB2 aphid GGGGG3
                   BGGBB2 graph GGGGG3
                   BYBBB2 morph GGGGG3
                   BYGBB2 sharp GGGGG3
                   BYYBB2 ralph GGGGG3
                   GBBBB2 chump GGGGG3
                   GBGBB2 champ GGGGG3
                   GBYBY2 cheap GGGGG3
                   GYBBB2 chirp GGGGG3
                   YBBBB2 pouch GBBGG3 pinch GGGGG4
                                GBYGG3 punch GGGGG4
                                GGBGG3 pooch GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                   YBBBY2 epoch GGGGG3
                   YBBYB2 pitch GGGGG3
                   YBGBY2 peach GGGGG3
                   YBYYB2 patch GGGGG3
                   YYBBB2 porch GGGGG3
                   YYBBY2 perch GGGGG3
      YBYBG1 phony GGGGG2
      YGBBB1 myrrh GGGGG2
      YGYBB1 lymph BGGGG2 nymph GGGGG3
                   GGGGG2
      YYBBB1 rhyme BGGGG2 thyme GGGGG3
                   BYYBB2 youth GGGGG3
                   GGGGG2
      YYBBG1 shyly GGGGG2
      YYYBB1 glyph GGGGG2
